District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1125

Repealed

Nonjudicial dispute resolution.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-185, § 6, 35 DCR 7906
April 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1002, 45 DCR 1172
2001 Ed., § 29-1125.
1981 Ed., § 29-1205.